District of Columbia statutes.
1-1001.15

Candidacy for more than 1 office prohibited; multiple nominations; candidacy of officeholder for another office restricted.

(a)

No person shall be a candidate for more than one office on the State Board of Education, the Council, Mayor, or Attorney General in any election for the members of the State Board of Education, the Council, Mayor, or Attorney General, and no person shall be a candidate for more than one office on the Council, Mayor, or Attorney General in any primary election. If a person is nominated for more than 1 such office, he or she shall, within 3 days after the Board has sent him notice that he or she has been so nominated, designate in writing the office for which he or she wishes to run, in which case he or she will be deemed to have withdrawn all other nominations. In the event that such person fails within such 3-day period to file such a designation with the Board, all such nominations of such person shall be deemed withdrawn.

(b)

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a person holding the office of Delegate, Chairman or member of the Council, Mayor, Attorney General, or member of the State Board of Education shall, while holding such office, be eligible as a candidate for any other of such offices in any primary or general election. In the event that said person is elected in a general election to the office for which he or she is a candidate, that person shall, within 24 hours of the date that the Board certifies said person’s election, pursuant to subsection (a)(11) of § 1-1001.05, either resign from the office that person currently holds or shall decline to accept the office for which he or she was a candidate. In the event that said person elects to resign, said resignation shall be effective not later than 24 hours before the date upon which that person would assume the office to which he or she has been elected.

History

Aug. 12, 1955, 69 Stat. 704, ch. 862, § 15
as added Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 106, Pub. L. 90-292, § 4(9)
Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 835, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 751(9), (10)
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 2, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 2(j), (o), (q), 29 DCR 458
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 22, 32 DCR 30
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 301(d), 60 DCR 15487
Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-167, § 2(f), 61 DCR 10738

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1319.
1973 Ed., § 1-1115.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 substituted “No person shall be a candidate for more than one office on the Board of Education, the Council, Mayor, or Attorney General in any election for the members of the Board of Education, the Council, Mayor, or Attorney General, and no person shall be a candidate for more than one office on the Council, Mayor, or Attorney General in any primary election” for “No person shall be a candidate for more than 1 office on the Board of Education or the Council or Mayor in any election for the members of the Board of Education or the Council or Mayor, and no person shall be a candidate for more than 1 office on the Council or for the Mayor in any primary election” in (a); and substituted “Delegate, Chairman or member of the Council, Mayor, Attorney General” for “Mayor, Delegate, Chairman or member of the Council” in (b).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-167 substituted “State Board of Education” for “Board of Education” throughout the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Election Code Conforming Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-143, July 31, 2013, 60 DCR 11799, 20 DCSTAT 1990).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(f) of the Special Election Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-617, Jan. 28, 2015, 62 DCR 1908, 21 STAT 794).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(b) of 20-60 provided that § 301 of the act shall apply as of December 13, 2013.